District of Columbia statutes.
11-2106

Accounts.

All fees, costs, and other moneys, except uncollected fees not required by law to be prepaid, collected by the Register of Wills with respect to matters within the jurisdiction of the Superior Court shall be turned over to the Fiscal Officer of the District of Columbia courts.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 517, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
1981 Ed., § 11-2106.
1973 Ed., § 11-2106.